__1st_try_roman_lexica__/posnum.lexc
!!!posnum.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +Posnum

LEXICON Root
Posnum;

LEXICON PosnumInf
+Posnum:0 #;

LEXICON Posnum
!Lexical items from corpus
12	PosnumInf;
ejdem	PosnumInf;
yk	PosnumInf;
pnjae	PosnumInf;
eftad	PosnumInf;
85	PosnumInf;
swm	PosnumInf;
10	PosnumInf;
308	PosnumInf;
84	PosnumInf;
18	PosnumInf;
byst	PosnumInf;
pnjm	PosnumInf;
awl	PosnumInf;
swm	PosnumInf;
89	PosnumInf;
65	PosnumInf;
90	PosnumInf;
11	PosnumInf;
nxst	PosnumInf;
ezar	PosnumInf;
awlye	PosnumInf;
nxstyn	PosnumInf;
ešt	PosnumInf;
44	PosnumInf;
45	PosnumInf;
28	PosnumInf;
40	PosnumInf;
1	PosnumInf;
dw	PosnumInf;
eftm	PosnumInf;
5	PosnumInf;
7	PosnumInf;
bystm	PosnumInf;
pablnd	PosnumInf;
nwzdem	PosnumInf;
çalç	PosnumInf;
nem	PosnumInf;
304	PosnumInf;
dwazdem	PosnumInf;
9	PosnumInf;
āxr	PosnumInf;
šanzdem	PosnumInf;
ššm	PosnumInf;
yazdem	PosnumInf;
ykm	PosnumInf;
eyjdem	PosnumInf;
panzdem	PosnumInf;
220	PosnumInf;
3	PosnumInf;
syzdem	PosnumInf;
čear	PosnumInf;
čeardem	PosnumInf;
32	PosnumInf;
eštm	PosnumInf;
dem	PosnumInf;
dwm	PosnumInf;
čearm	PosnumInf;
se	PosnumInf;
360	PosnumInf;
